Illinois, session 104th, HB5003.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:5        (1) responsible scientific research into artificial 6    intelligence applications for mental health care serves 7    the public interest by potentially expanding access to 8    evidence-based treatment for underserved populations;9        (2) academic research conducted under rigorous 10    institutional oversight, with appropriate safeguards and 11    ethical review, is categorically distinct from unregulated 12    commercial artificial intelligence therapy services 13    marketed directly to consumers;14        (3) Illinois has a compelling interest in maintaining 15    its position as a leader in responsible health care 16    innovation while protecting patients from harm; and17        (4) research exemptions with appropriate safeguards 18    can advance scientific knowledge without compromising the 19    consumer protection objectives of the original Act. 20    Section 2. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to amend the 21Wellness and Oversight for Psychological Resources Act to 22establish a limited exemption for bona fide clinical research 23conducted at academic medical centers, while maintaining the   HB5003- 2 -LRB104 18445 AAS 31887 b1Act's core consumer protections against unregulated artificial 2intelligence therapy services. 3    Section 5. The Wellness and Oversight for Psychological 4Resources Act is amended by adding Section 20.1 as follows: 5    (225 ILCS 155/20.1 new)6    Sec. 20.1. Artificial intelligence-assisted therapy; 7qualified research programs. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "qualified research program" 9means a program of clinical research that satisfies all the 10following criteria: 11        (1) The research is conducted by or under the 12    supervision of an academic medical center that:13            (A) is affiliated with an accredited medical 14        school or university;15            (B) operates under a valid hospital license issued 16        by the Department of Public Health; and17            (C) maintains accreditation by the Joint 18        Commission or an equivalent national accrediting body.19        (2) The research protocol has received approval from 20    an Institutional Review Board (IRB) registered with the 21    United States Department of Health and Human Services 22    Office for Human Research Protections and the IRB:23            (A) has determined that the research satisfies 24        federal regulations for the protection of human   HB5003- 3 -LRB104 18445 AAS 31887 b1        subjects under 45 CFR Part 46;2            (B) conducts a continuing review of the research 3        at intervals appropriate to the degree of risk, but no 4        less than annually; and5            (C) has specific expertise or consultation in 6        mental health research, artificial intelligence 7        applications, and research ethics.8        (3) All artificial intelligence systems used in the 9    research:10            (A) are designed and operated in compliance with 11        the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability 12        Act (HIPAA) and all applicable federal and State 13        privacy regulations;14            (B) undergo documented safety testing to identify 15        and mitigate potential harms before use with human 16        research participants;17            (C) include real-time monitoring mechanisms to 18        detect and respond to crisis situations, harmful 19        content, or therapeutic errors; and20            (D) are used only as adjuncts to, and not 21        replacements for, services provided by licensed mental 22        health professionals.23        (4) All research participants:24            (A) must provide informed consent that 25        specifically describes the use of artificial 26        intelligence, the experimental nature of the   HB5003- 4 -LRB104 18445 AAS 31887 b1        intervention, potential risks and benefits, and 2        alternatives to participation;3            (B) are informed in writing of the participants' 4        right to withdraw from the research at any time 5        without penalty;6            (C) receive information about how to access 7        licensed mental health professionals outside the 8        research context; and9            (D) have access to licensed mental health 10        professionals who can intervene if safety concerns 11        arise during the research.12        (5) The research program maintains:13            (A) a data safety monitoring plan appropriate to 14        the level of risk;15            (B) procedures for reporting adverse events to the 16        IRB and, where applicable, to federal oversight 17        agencies;18            (C) documentation of all protocol modifications 19        and safety incidents; and20            (D) plans for dissemination of research findings 21        through peer-reviewed scientific publications or 22        presentations.23        (6) The primary purpose of the research program is to 24    generate generalizable scientific knowledge about the 25    safety, efficacy, or implementation of artificial 26    intelligence applications in mental health care, rather   HB5003- 5 -LRB104 18445 AAS 31887 b1    than to provide routine clinical services or to market 2    commercial products.3    (b) The prohibitions under Section 20 of this Act shall 4not apply to artificial intelligence-assisted therapy or 5psychotherapy services provided exclusively within a qualified 6research program, subject to the requirements and limitations 7specified in this Section.8    (c) A licensed professional participating in a qualified 9research program shall:10        (1) maintain an active, unrestricted license in good 11    standing as required under Illinois law;12        (2) receive training specific to the artificial 13    intelligence systems used in the research, including the 14    artificial intelligence systems' capabilities, 15    limitations, and potential risks;16        (3) maintain ultimate clinical responsibility for all 17    care provided to research participants;18        (4) be available to intervene when safety concerns 19    arise or when the artificial intelligence system's 20    performance is inadequate; and21        (5) document the licensed professional's supervision 22    and oversight activities in accordance with the research 23    protocol.24    (d) Academic medical centers shall register qualified 25research programs in existence on the effective date of this 26amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly within 90 days   HB5003- 6 -LRB104 18445 AAS 31887 b1after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 2General Assembly.3    (e) The exemption under this Section shall apply only to 4services provided within the context of an approved research 5protocol and shall not extend to:6        (1) clinical services marketed or provided outside a 7    research context;8        (2) services provided primarily for revenue generation 9    rather than scientific inquiry; and10        (3) services provided without active IRB approval and 11    oversight.12    (f) An academic medical center shall not:13        (1) advertise artificial intelligence therapy services 14    to the general public as routine clinical services;15        (2) use the exemption under this Section to circumvent 16    licensing requirements for commercial therapy services; 17    and18        (3) charge research participants fees beyond those 19    disclosed in and permitted by the IRB-approved research 20    protocol.21    (g) An academic medical center conducting a qualified 22research program shall:23        (1) register such programs with the Department within 24    30 days after IRB approval;25        (2) provide annual reports to the Department 26    summarizing the number of research participants, any   HB5003- 7 -LRB104 18445 AAS 31887 b1    serious adverse events, any protocol modifications, and 2    any scientific findings; and3        (3) notify the Department within 10 business days of 4    any IRB suspension or termination of a research protocol.5    (h) Research participants shall not be denied access to 6standard care as a condition of participating in research 7involving artificial intelligence-assisted therapy.8    (i) The Department shall comply with the following 9requirements:10        (1) maintain a public registry of qualified research 11    programs operating under this Section;12        (2) develop forms and procedures for registration and 13    annual reporting; and14        (3) coordinate with relevant professional licensing 15    boards to ensure compliance with this Section.16    (j) Any academic medical center or licensed professional 17found to have misrepresented a commercial service as 18qualifying for the exemption under this Section, or to have 19otherwise violated the requirements of this Section, is 20subject to the following:21        (1) immediate loss of exemption status for the program 22    in question;23        (2) civil penalties under Section 30;24        (3) referral to the appropriate licensing boards for 25    professional discipline; and26        (4) prohibition from seeking exemption status for new   HB5003- 8 -LRB104 18445 AAS 31887 b1    research programs for a period of not less than 2 years.2    (k) No later than July 1, 2029, the Department shall 3submit a report to the General Assembly evaluating the 4following:5        (1) the number and nature of research programs that 6    have operated under the exemption under this Section;7        (2) any reported adverse events or safety concerns;8        (3) scientific findings regarding the safety and 9    efficacy of artificial intelligence applications in mental 10    health care; and11        (4) recommendations regarding whether the exemption 12    under this Section should be continued, modified, or 13    allowed to expire. 14    (l) Nothing in this Section shall limit the authority of 15professional licensing boards to discipline licensed 16professionals for violations of professional standards of 17care.18    (m) The provisions of this Section are severable under 19Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 20    (n) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2030.